Washington statutes.
RCW 19.05.080

Labor and industries—Administrative citation appeals.

(1) A person, firm, or corporation aggrieved by a citation and notice of assessment by the department under this chapter may appeal the citation and notice of assessment to the director of the department by filing a notice of appeal with the director within 30 days of the department's issuance of the citation and notice of assessment. A citation and notice of assessment not appealed within 30 days is final and binding, and not subject to further appeal.

(2) A notice of appeal filed with the director of the department under this section must state the effectiveness of the citation and notice of assessment pending final review of the appeal by the director as provided for in chapter 34.05 RCW.

(3) Upon receipt of a notice of appeal, the director of the department must assign the hearing to an administrative law judge of the office of administrative hearings to conduct the hearing and issue an initial order. The hearing and review procedures must be conducted in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, and the standard of review by the administrative law judge of an appealed citation and notice of assessment must be de novo. Any party who seeks to challenge an initial order must file a petition for administrative review with the director within 30 days after service of the initial order. The director must conduct administrative review in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.

(4) The director of the department must issue all final orders after appeal of the initial order. The final order of the director is subject to judicial review in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.

(5) Orders that are not appealed within the time period specified in this section and chapter 34.05 RCW are final and binding, and not subject to further appeal.

(6) An employer who fails to allow adequate inspection of records in an investigation by the department under this section within a reasonable time period may not use such records in any appeal under this section to challenge the correctness of any determination by the department of the penalty assessed.

[ 2024 c 327 s 8.]

NOTES:

Conflict with federal requirements—2024 c 327: See note following RCW 19.05.020.